Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Metro Deaf School. new text end new text begin (a) For a grant to Metro Deaf School to provide services to young children who have a primary disability of deaf, deafblind, or hard-of-hearing and who are not eligible for funding under Minnesota Statutes, section 124E.11, paragraph (h): new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 150,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 150,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end